pl: Orientacja miecha: Oburęczny / Zamienny; Dla leworęcznych; Dla praworęcznych; Inne
fi: Palkeiden suunta: Molempikätinen/muunnettava; Vasenkätinen; Oikeakätinen; Muu
el: Προσανατολισμός φυσητήρα: Αμφιδέξιος/μετατρέψιμος; Αριστερόχειρας; Δεξιόχειρας; Άλλο
en: Bellows orientation: Ambidextrous/convertible; Left-handed; Right-handed; Other
bg-BG: Ориентация на маншона: За двете ръце/трансформиращ се; За левичари; За десничари; Друго
fr: Orientation du soufflet: Ambidextre/convertible; Gaucher; Droitier; Autre
zh-CN: 风箱朝向: 左右手通用/可转换; 左手; 右手; 其他
cs: Orientace měchů: Obouruční/přestavitelné; Pro leváky; Pro praváky; Jiné
pt-BR: Orientação do fole: Ambidestro/conversível; Canhoto; Destro; Outros
hr-HR: Orijentacija mijeha: Za obje ruke / pretvorivo; Za ljevake; Za dešnjake; Ostalo
hu: Fújtató tájolása: Kétkezes/átalakítható; Balkezes; Jobbkezes; Egyéb
ja: ベローズの向き: 両利き用/コンバーチブル; 左利き用; 右利き用; その他
de: Ausrichtung des Balgs: Beidhändig/konvertibel; Linkshändig; Rechtshändig; Sonstige
sl-SI: Orientacija meha: Za obojestransko uporabo/zamenljivo; Za levičarje; Za desničarje; Drugo
nl: Balg oriëntatie: Tweehandig/omkeerbaar; Linkshandig; Rechtshandig; Overig
da: Bælgretning: Ambidextrøs/konvertibel; Venstrehåndet; Højrehåndet; Anden
nb: Belgorientering: For høyre og venstre hånd / konverterbar; Venstrehendt; Høyrehendt; Annet
lt-LT: Silfonų išdėstymas: Pritaikomas abiem rankom / keičiamas; Kairei rankai; Dešinei rankai; Kita
ru: Ориентация сильфона: Универсальная/симметричная; Для левшей; Для правшей; Другое
es: Orientación del fuelle: Ambidiestro/convertible; Para zurdos; Para diestros; Otro
sv: Bälgorientering: Ambidextrös/konverterbar; För vänsterhänta; För högerhänta; Övrigt
zh-TW: 風箱方向: 左右手通用/可轉換; 左撇子專用; 右撇子專用; 其他
ko: 풀무 방향: 양손잡이/전환 가능; 왼손잡이용; 오른손잡이용; 기타
th: ทิศทางการติดตั้งเบลโลว์: ใช้ได้ทั้งสองมือ/เปลี่ยนข้างได้; ถนัดซ้าย; ถนัดขวา; อื่นๆ
tr: Körük yönelimi: Her iki elle kullanılabilir/dönüştürülebilir; Solak; Sağ elini kullanan; Diğer
vi: Hướng của ống thổi: Cả hai tay/có thể chuyển đổi; Thuận tay trái; Thuận tay phải; Khác
sk-SK: Orientácia vlnovca: Obojručné/konvertibilné; Pre ľavákov; Pre pravákov; Iné
it: Orientamento del soffietto: Ambidestro/convertibile; Per mancini; Per destrimani; Altro
pt-PT: Orientação do fole: Ambidestro/conversível; Para esquerdinos; Para destros; Outro
ro-RO: Orientarea burdufului: Ambidextru/convertibil; Pentru stângaci; Pentru dreptaci; Altele